Utah statutes.
73-16-3.   Ratification of compact.
The compact ratified by this act is the original signed by the commissioners
representing the states of Idaho, Utah, and Wyoming, and the secretary of the
commission, and approved by the representative of the United States of
America, and deposited in the archives of the Department of State of the
United States of America and with the Division of Archives of the state of
Utah.
